en: False irish moss seaweeds, False irish moss
es: Algas musgo estrellado, Musgo estrellado
fr: Mastocarpus stellatus
hr: Morske alge lažne irske mahovine
la: Mastocarpus stellatus
nl: Mastocarpus stellatus algen

en: Dried false irish moss seaweeds
es: Algas musgo estrellado deshidratadas
hr: Osušene alge lažne irske mahovine
nl: Gedroogde Mastocarpus stellatus

en: Hijiki seaweeds, Hijiki, Hiziki
es: Algas hijiki, Hijiki, Hiziki
fr: Algues hijiki, Hijiki, Hiziki
hr: Hijiki morske trave
ja: ヒジキ, ひじき
la: Sargassum fusiforme
nl: Hijiki algen

en: Dried hijiki seaweeds
es: Algas hijiki deshidratadas, Algas hiziki deshidratadas
fr: Algues hijiki sèches
hr: Sušene alge hijiki
ja: 干ひじき
nl: Gedroogde hijiki algen

en: Irish moss seaweeds, Irish moss
es: Algas musgo de Irlanda, Musgo de Irlanda
fr: Algues mousse d'Irlande, Mousse d'Irlande, Goémon blanc
hr: Morske alge irske mahovine
la: Chondrus crispus
nl: Iers mos

en: Dried irish moss seaweeds
es: Algas musgo de Irlanda deshidratadas
fr: Algues mousse d'Irlande sèches
hr: Osušene morske alge irske mahovine
nl: Gedroogd iers mos

en: Irish moss seaweed powders, Ground dried irish moss seaweeds
es: Algas musgo de Irlanda en polvo, Algas musgo de Irlanda deshidratadas en polvo
hr: Prah morskih algi irske mahovine
nl: Ierse mospoeders

en: Kombu seaweeds, Kombu
es: Algas kombu, Kombu
fr: Algues kombu, Kombu
hr: Kombu alge
ja: 昆布
ko: 다시마
nl: Kombu, Konbu

en: Dried sea belt, Dehydrated sea belt, Dehydrated Saccharina latissima, Dried Saccharina latissima
fr: Kombu royal séchée, Kombu royal déshydratée, Saccharina latissima déshydratée, Saccharina latissima séchée

en: Dried Tangle, Dehydrated Tangle
fr: Kombu breton séchée, Kombu breton déshydratée, Laminaria digitata séchée, Laminaria digitata déshydratée

en: Dried kombu seaweeds
es: Algas kombu deshidratadas
fr: Algues kombu sèches
hr: Sušene kombu alge
nl: Gedroogde kombus

en: Kombu seaweed powders, Ground dried kombu seaweeds
es: Algas kombu en polvo, Algas kombu deshidratadas en polvo
hr: Kombu alge u prahu
nl: Kombupoeder

en: Mixed seaweeds
es: Mezclas de algas
fr: Mélanges d'algues
hr: Miješane morske trave
nl: Algenmengsel

en: Canned mixed seaweeds, Tinned mixtures of algae
es: Mezclas de algas en conserva
hr: Konzervirane miješane alge
nl: Algenmengsels in blik/pot

en: Mixed dried seaweeds
es: Mezclas de algas deshidratadas
fr: Mélanges d'algues sèches
hr: Miješane suhe morske trave
nl: Gedroogde algenmengsels

en: Nori seaweeds, Nori
es: Algas nori, Nori
fi: Nori-merilevät, Nori
fr: Algues nori, Nori
hr: Nori alge
it: Alghe marine Nori
ja: 海苔
la: Porphyra
nl: Nori

en: Dried nori seaweeds
es: Algas nori deshidratadas
fi: Kuivatut nori-merilevät
fr: Algues nori sèches
hr: Sušene nori alge
nl: Gedroogde nori

en: Dried nori seaweed flakes
es: Algas nori deshidratadas en copos
fr: Flocons d'algues nori séchées
hr: Sušene pahuljice nori alge
nl: Norivlokken

en: Dried nori seaweed sheets
es: Algas nori deshidratadas en láminas
fr: Feuilles d'algues nori séchées
hr: Listovi osušene nori alge
nl: Noribladeren

en: Nori seaweed powders, Ground dried nori seaweeds
es: Algas nori en polvo, Algas nori deshidratadas en polvo
hr: Nori alge u prahu
nl: Noripoeders